Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 29.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201023-1831
Organ and tissue
donations; report provided to coroner; contents.

Any
physician or designated recovery personnel authorized by the federally designated
organ procurement organization for Nebraska to recover any
organ or tissue pursuant to section 23-1827 or 23-1828 shall provide to the
coroner a report detailing the recovery of such organ or tissue and any known
relationship to the proximate cause or means of death. If appropriate, such
report shall include a biopsy or medically approved sample from the recovered
organ or tissue and the results of any diagnostic testing performed upon the
recovered organ or tissue. Such report shall become part of the coroner's report or coroner's physician's
report.

Laws 2008, LB246, § 7;

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 29.